src/fst/lexicon.tmp.lexc
LEXICON Symbols !!≈ __@CODE@__ contains symbols of two types: those that inflect, and those that don't.

!! Miscellaneous symbols

   §    Noun_symbols_possibly_inflected    ;
  §§    Noun_symbols_possibly_inflected    ;
!  ¥    Noun_symbols_possibly_inflected    ;
   $    Noun_symbols_possibly_inflected    ;
   €    Noun_symbols_possibly_inflected    ;
   £    Noun_symbols_possibly_inflected    ;
  %%    Noun_symbols_possibly_inflected    ;
   ®    Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   ©    Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   √    Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   ◊    Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   ♦    Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   ☐    Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   ⚬    Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
  %#:#7 Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
  №     Noun_symbols_never_inflected ;
  „     Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
!  º     Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ; !Foreløpig, til dette fikset
  ‰     Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
  ●     Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
  −     Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
  ¬     Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;

!! Symbols from Mari OCR reading

\   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
¢   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
¦   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ª   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
Ç   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
Ð   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
Ñ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
×   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
Þ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ç   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ñ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ś   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
Ȭ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
Ⱥ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
Ȼ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ȼ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
Ƚ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
Ⱦ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ȿ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɀ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
Ɂ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɂ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
Ƀ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
Ʌ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
Ɇ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɇ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
Ɉ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɉ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
Ɋ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɋ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
Ɍ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɍ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɐ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɑ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɒ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɓ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɕ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɖ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɗ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɘ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ə   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɚ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɛ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɜ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɝ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɞ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɟ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɠ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɡ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɢ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɣ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɤ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɥ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɦ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɧ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɩ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɪ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɫ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɬ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɭ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɮ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɯ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɰ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɱ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɲ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɳ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɴ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɶ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɷ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɸ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɹ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ɺ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ʋ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ʼ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ˆ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
́   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
̈   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
̌   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
̶   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ϸ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
֪   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ٕ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
ٴ   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
‒   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
‡   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
‰   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
⃰   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
№   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
™   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
→   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
■   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
□   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
▲   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
►   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
▼   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
★   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
☆   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
☺   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
♦   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
✓   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
❖   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;

! These symbols are private use area U+F020 - U+F0FC
! (i.w. F000 to F0FF). These could be removed rather than analysed.
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;
   Noun_symbols_never_inflected       ;



!! Smileys
 %:-) Noun_symbols_never_inflected ;
 %:)  Noun_symbols_never_inflected ;
 %:-| Noun_symbols_never_inflected ;
 %:|  Noun_symbols_never_inflected ;
 %:-( Noun_symbols_never_inflected ;
 %:(  Noun_symbols_never_inflected ;

!! Emojies
 😄 Noun_symbols_never_inflected ;
 🙂 Noun_symbols_never_inflected ;
